Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.140

Exemptions.

(1) Food in transit from one processing facility to another processing facility to complete its preparation for sale is exempt from the labeling requirements of this chapter, but is otherwise subject to all applicable provisions of this chapter.

(2) This chapter is not applicable to kosher food to the extent necessary to produce kosher food products as defined in RCW 69.90.010.

(3) This chapter is not applicable to halal food to the extent necessary to produce halal food as defined in RCW 69.91.010.

[ 2024 c 245 s 5; 2018 c 236 s 105.]